Washington statutes.
RCW 41.35.150

Hearing prior to appeal required—Conduct of hearing.

Following its receipt of a notice for hearing in accordance with RCW 41.35.140, a hearing shall be held by the director or a duly authorized representative, in the county of the residence of the claimant at a time and place designated by the director. Such hearing shall be conducted and governed in all respects by the provisions of chapter 34.05 RCW.

[ 1998 c 341 s 16.]